Montana, session 2025, HB820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Veteran and Montana national guard service member on-campus
parking permit exemption. (1) The regents of the Montana university system may not assess on-campus
parking permit fees for veteran and Montana national guard service member faculty, staff, and students who
are employed or enrolled at a unit of the Montana university system, as provided in 20-25-201.
(2) The regents of Montana university system shall direct the president of each unit to provide
preference to veteran and Montana national guard service member faculty, staff, and students when issuing on-
campus parking permits.
(3) A veteran or Montana national guard service member faculty, staff, or student shall provide
proof of service to a unit's parking permitting office to be eligible for a free on-campus parking permit.
(4) The president of each unit of the Montana university system may make rules concerning free
on-campus parking for veterans and Montana national guard service member faculty, staff, and students.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 25, part 3, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 25, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 820